District of Columbia statutes.
47-2511

Severability.

If any provision of this chapter, or application thereof, to any person or circumstances is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

Sept. 13, 1980, D.C. Law 3-95, § 402, 27 DCR 3509
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-2511.